Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Business Combinations

271B.12-200.
Definitions for KRS 271B.12-210 to 271B.12-230.

As used in KRS

271B.12-210

to

271B.12-230

:

“Affiliate,” including the term “affiliated person,” means a person who directly, or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, a specified person.

“Associate,” when used to indicate a relationship with any person, means:

Any corporation or organization (other than the corporation or a subsidiary of the corporation) of which such person is an officer, director or partner or is, directly or indirectly, the beneficial owner of ten percent (10%) or more of any class of equity securities;

Any trust or other estate in which such person has a substantial beneficial interest or as to which such person serves as trustee or in a similar fiduciary capacity; and

Any relative or spouse of such person, or any relative of such spouse, any one (1) of whom has the same home as such person or is a director or officer of the corporation or any of its affiliates.

“Beneficial owner,” when used with respect to any voting stock, means a person:

Who, individually or with any of its affiliates or associates, beneficially owns voting stock, directly or indirectly; or

Who, individually or with any of its affiliates or associates, has:

The right to acquire voting stock, whether such right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time and whether or not such right is exercisable only after specified conditions are met, pursuant to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding or upon the exercise of conversion rights, exchange rights, warrants or options, or otherwise;

The right to vote voting stock pursuant to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding; or

Any agreement, arrangement, or understanding for the purpose of acquiring, holding, voting or disposing of voting stock with any other person who beneficially owns, or whose affiliates or associates beneficially own, directly or indirectly, such shares of voting stock; however, for the purposes of this section and KRS

271B.12-230

the beneficial owner of any voting stock held by, or owned through participation in, any purchase, savings, option, bonus, appreciation, profit sharing, thrift, incentive, pension, stock ownership or similar plan for employees or officers of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries shall be deemed to be the shareholder of record of such voting stock as shown on the stock transfer books of the corporation.

“Business combination” means:

Unless the merger or consolidation does not alter the contract rights of the stock as expressly set forth in the articles of incorporation or change or convert in whole or in part the outstanding shares of stock of the corporation, any merger or consolidation of the corporation or any subsidiary with any interested shareholder or any other corporation, whether or not itself an interested shareholder, which is, or after the merger or consolidation would be, an affiliate or associate of an interested shareholder who was an interested shareholder prior to the transaction;

Any sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition, other than in the ordinary course of business, in one (1) transaction or a series of transactions in any twelve-month period, to any interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of any interested shareholder, other than the corporation or any subsidiaries, of any assets of the corporation or any subsidiary having, measured at the time the transaction or transactions are approved by the board of directors of the corporation, an aggregate book value as of the end of the corporation’s most recently ended fiscal quarter of five percent (5%) or more of the total market value of the outstanding stock of the corporation or of its net worth as of the end of its most recently ended fiscal quarter;

The issuance or transfer by the corporation, or any subsidiary, in one transaction or a series of transactions in any twelve-month period, of any equity securities of the corporation or any subsidiary which have an aggregate market value of five percent (5%) or more of the total market value of the outstanding stock of the corporation, determined as of the end of the corporation’s most recently ended fiscal quarter prior to the first such issuance or transfer, to any interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of any interested shareholder, other than the corporation or any of its subsidiaries, except pursuant to the exercise of warrants or rights to purchase securities offered pro rata to all holders of the corporation’s voting stock or any other method affording substantially proportionate treatment to the holders of voting stock;

The adoption of any plan or proposal for the liquidation or dissolution of the corporation in which anything other than cash will be received by an interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of any interested shareholder; or

Any reclassification of securities, including any reverse stock split; or recapitalization of the corporation; or any merger or consolidation of the corporation with any of its subsidiaries; or any other transaction which has the effect, directly or indirectly, in one transaction or a series of transactions, of increasing by five percent (5%) or more the proportionate amount of the outstanding shares of any class of equity securities of the corporation or any subsidiary which is directly or indirectly beneficially owned by any interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of any interested shareholder; or

Any receipt by an interested shareholder or any affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder of the benefit directly or indirectly, except proportionately as a shareholder of such corporation, of any loans, advances, guaranties, pledges or other financial assistance, or any tax credits or other tax advantages provided by or through such corporation.

“Common stock” means any stock other than preferred or preference stock.

“Continuing director” means any member of the board of directors who is not an affiliate or associate of an interested shareholder or any of its affiliates, other than the corporation or any of its subsidiaries, and who was a director of the corporation prior to the time the interested shareholder became an interested shareholder, and any successor to such continuing director who is not an affiliate or associate of an interested shareholder or any of its affiliates, other than the corporation or any of its subsidiaries, and was recommended or elected by a majority of the continuing directors at a meeting at which a quorum consisting of a majority of the continuing directors is present.

“Control,” including the terms “controlling,” “controlled by” and “under common control with,” means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise, and the beneficial ownership of ten percent (10%) or more of the votes entitled to be cast by a corporation’s voting stock creates a presumption of control.

“Equity security” means:

Any stock or similar security, certificate of interest, or participation in any profit-sharing agreement, voting trust certificate, or certificate of deposit for the foregoing;

Any security convertible, with or without consideration, into an equity security, or any warrant or other security carrying any right to subscribe to or purchase an equity security; or

Any put, call, straddle, or other option, right or privilege of acquiring an equity security from or selling an equity security to another without being bound to do so.

“Independent member” of the board of directors means any director who is not an officer or full-time employee of the corporation or an affiliate or associate of an interested shareholder or any of its affiliates.

“Interested shareholder” means any person, other than the corporation or any of its subsidiaries, who:

Is the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of ten percent (10%) or more of the voting power of the outstanding voting stock of the corporation; or is an affiliate of the corporation and at any time within the five (5) year period immediately prior to the date in question was the beneficial owner, directly or indirectly, of ten percent (10%) or more of the voting power of the then outstanding voting stock of the corporation. The term interested shareholder shall not mean any entity or person holding or owning voting stock for, or through participation in, any purchase, savings, option, bonus, appreciation, profit sharing, thrift, incentive, pension, stock ownership or similar plan for employees or officers of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries.

For the purpose of determining whether a person is an interested shareholder, the number of shares of voting stock deemed to be outstanding shall include shares deemed owned by the person through application of subsection (3) of this section, but shall not include any other shares of voting stock which may be issuable pursuant to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding, or upon exercise of conversion rights, warrants or options, or otherwise.

“Market value” means:

In the case of stock, the highest closing sale price during the thirty-day period immediately preceding the date in question of a share of such stock on the composite tape for New York stock exchange listed stocks, or, if such stock is not quoted on the composite tape on the New York stock exchange, or if such stock is not listed on such exchange, on the principal United States securities exchange registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 on which such stock is listed, or, if such stock is not listed on any such exchange, the highest closing bid quotation with respect to a share of such stock during the thirty-day period preceding the date in question on the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc., Automated Quotations System or any system then in use, or if no such quotations are available, the fair market value on the date in question of a share of such stock as determined by a majority of the continuing directors at a meeting of the board of directors at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the continuing directors is present; and

In the case of property other than cash or stock, the fair market value of such property on the date in question as determined by a majority of the continuing directors at a meeting of the board of directors at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the continuing directors is present.

“Subsidiary” means any corporation of which voting stock having a majority of the votes entitled to be cast is owned, directly or indirectly, by the corporation.

“Voting stock” means shares of capital stock of a corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 355, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 22, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

271B.12-210.
Minimum share vote requirements for approval of business combinations — Limitations on business corporation.

In addition to any vote otherwise required by law or the articles of incorporation of the corporation, a business combination shall either be approved by a majority of the independent members of the board of directors who are also continuing directors, provided that the independent members of the board of directors shall not, for the purposes of this subsection, be required to either approve or disapprove of any proposed business combination, or approved by the affirmative vote of at least:

Eighty percent (80%) of the votes entitled to be cast by outstanding shares of voting stock of the corporation, voting together as a single voting group; and

Two-thirds of the votes entitled to be cast by holders of voting stock other than voting stock beneficially owned by the interested shareholder who is, or whose affiliate is, a party to the business combination or by an affiliate or associate of such interested shareholder, voting together as a single voting group.

Unless a business combination is exempted from the operation of KRS

271B.12-200

to

271B.12-230

in accordance with the terms hereof, the failure to comply with the voting requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall render such business combination void.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this chapter (except the provisions of KRS

271B.12-220

(5)(a)), no corporation shall engage in any business combination with any entity or person who is at the time of such business combination an interested shareholder of such corporation, unless such person became an interested shareholder before March 28, 1986, for a period of five (5) years following the date on which such interested shareholder became an interested shareholder unless such business combination is approved by a majority of the independent members of the board of directors of such corporation prior to such date on which the interested shareholder became an interested shareholder. If a good faith proposal is made in writing to the board of directors of such corporation regarding a business combination, the board of directors shall respond, in writing, within thirty (30) days or such shorter period, if any, as may be required by the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, setting forth its reasons for its decision regarding such proposal. If the board of directors does not respond affirmatively in writing within thirty (30) days or such shorter period, if any, as may be required by the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the independent members of the board of directors shall be deemed to have disapproved the business combination.

In discharging its duties under this section, or otherwise, the board of directors, in considering the best interests of the corporation, may consider in addition to the interests of the corporation’s shareholders, any of the following:

The interests of the corporation’s employees, suppliers, creditors and customers;

The economy of the state and nation;

Community and societal considerations; and

The long-term as well as short-term interests of the corporation and its shareholders, including the possibility that these interests may be best served by the continued independence of the corporation.

Notwithstanding KRS

271B.6-020

and any other provision of this chapter, and unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation before the creation or issuance of any rights or options as set forth herein, in considering the interests of the corporation’s shareholders, the board of directors of a corporation may, before, on or after July 15, 1988, create and issue rights or options pursuant to KRS

271B.6-240

which may contain provisions which adjust the option price or number of shares issuable under such rights or options in the event of an acquisition of shares or a reorganization, merger, consolidation, sale of assets or other occurrence involving such corporation. Such rights or options may also include conditions that prevent the holder or holders of at least a specified number or percentage of the outstanding shares of the corporation, including subsequent transferees of the holder, from exercising those rights or options.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 355, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 202, § 10, effective March 28, 1986; 1988, ch. 22, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.

271B.12-220.
Exemptions from minimum share vote requirements.

For purposes of subsection (2) of this section:

“Announcement date” means the first general public announcement of the proposal or intention to make a proposal of the business combination or its first communication generally to shareholders of the corporation, whichever is earlier;

“Determination date” means the date on which an interested shareholder first became an interested shareholder; and

“Valuation date” means:

For a business combination voted upon by shareholders, the latter of the day prior to the date of the shareholders vote or the date twenty (20) days prior to the consummation of the business combination; and

For a business combination not voted upon by shareholders, the date of the consummation of the business combination.

The vote required by KRS

271B.12-210

does not apply to a business combination if each of the following conditions is met:

The aggregate amount of the cash and the market value as of the valuation date of consideration, other than cash to be received per share by holders of common stock in such business combination, is at least equal to the highest of the following:

The highest per share price (including any brokerage commissions, transfer taxes and soliciting dealers’ fees) paid by the interested shareholder for any shares of common stock of the same class or series acquired by it:

Within the five (5) year period immediately prior to the announcement date of the proposal of the business combination;

In the transaction in which it became an interested shareholder, whichever is higher; or

The market value per share of common stock of the same class or series on the announcement date or on the determination date, whichever is higher; or

The price per share equal to the market value per share of common stock of the same class or series determined pursuant to subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, multiplied by the fraction of:

The highest per share price, including any brokerage commissions, transfer taxes and soliciting dealers’ fees, paid by the interested shareholder for any shares of common stock of the same class or series acquired by it within the five (5) year period immediately prior to the announcement date, over

The market value per share of common stock of the same class or series on the first day in such five (5) year period on which the interested shareholder acquired any shares of common stock;

The aggregate amount of the cash and the market value as of the valuation date of consideration other than cash to be received per share by holders of shares of any class or series of outstanding stock other than common stock is at least equal to the highest of the following, whether or not the interested shareholder has previously acquired any shares of a particular class or series of stock:

The highest per share price, including any brokerage commissions, transfer taxes and soliciting dealers’ fees, paid by the interested shareholder for any shares of such class of stock acquired by it:

Within the five (5) year period immediately prior to the announcement date of the proposal of the business combination;

In the transaction in which it became an interested shareholder, whichever is higher; or

The highest preferential amount per share to which the holders of shares of such class of stock are entitled in the event of any voluntary or involuntary liquidation, dissolution or winding up of the corporation;

The market value per share of such class of stock on the announcement date or on the determination date, whichever is higher; or

The price per share equal to the market value per share of such class of stock determined pursuant to subparagraph 3. of this paragraph, multiplied by the fraction of:

The highest per share price, including any brokerage commissions, transfer taxes and soliciting dealers’ fees, paid by the interested shareholder for any shares of any class of voting stock acquired by it within the five (5) year period immediately prior to the announcement date, over

The market value per share of the same class of voting stock on the first day in such five (5) year period on which the interested shareholder acquired any shares of the same class of voting stock.

In making any price calculation under this section, appropriate adjustments shall be made to reflect any reclassification, including any reverse stock split; recapitalization; reorganization; or any similar transaction which has the effect of reducing the number of outstanding shares of the stock. The consideration to be received by holders of any class or series of outstanding stock is to be in cash or in the same form as the interested shareholder has previously paid for shares of the same class or series of stock. If the interested shareholder has paid for shares of any class of stock with varying forms of consideration, the form of consideration for such class of stock shall be either cash or the form used to acquire the largest number of shares of such class or series of stock previously acquired by it;

After the interested shareholder has become an interested shareholder and prior to the consummation of such business combination:

There shall have been no failure to declare and pay, at the regular date therefor, any full periodic dividends, whether or not cumulative, on any outstanding preferred stock of the corporation;

There shall have been no reduction in the annual rate of dividends paid on any class or series of stock of the corporation that is not preferred stock, except as necessary to reflect any subdivision of the stock; and an increase in such annual rate of dividends as necessary to reflect any reclassification, including any reverse stock split; recapitalization; reorganization; or any similar transaction which has the effect of reducing the number of outstanding shares of the stock; and

The interested shareholder did not become the beneficial owner of any additional shares of stock of the corporation, except as part of the transaction which resulted in such interested shareholder becoming an interested shareholder or by virtue of proportionate stock splits or stock dividends.

The provisions of sub-subparagraphs a. and b. of subparagraph 1. of this paragraph do not apply if no interested shareholder or an affiliate or associate of the interested shareholder voted as a director of the corporation in a manner inconsistent with such sub-subparagraphs and the interested shareholder, within ten (10) days after any act or failure to act inconsistent with such sub-subparagraphs, notifies the board of directors of the corporation in writing that the interested shareholder disapproves thereof and requests in good faith that the board of directors rectify such act or failure to act.

Whether or not such business combinations are authorized or consummated in whole or in part after July 13, 1984, or after the interested shareholder became an interested shareholder, the requirements of KRS

271B.12-210

do not apply to business combinations that specifically, generally, or generally by types, as to specifically identified or unidentified existing or future interested shareholders or their affiliates or associates, have been approved or exempted therefrom by resolution of the board of directors of the corporation prior to two (2) months after July 13, 1984, or such earlier date as may be irrevocably established by resolution of the board of directors; and

Unless by its terms a resolution adopted under this subsection is made irrevocable, it may be altered or repealed by the board of directors, but this shall not affect any business combinations that have been consummated, or are the subject of an existing agreement entered into, prior to the alteration or repeal.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation specifically provide otherwise, the requirements of KRS

271B.12-210

do not apply to business combinations of a corporation that, on July 13, 1984, had an existing interested shareholder, whether a business combination is with the existing shareholder or with any other person who becomes an interested shareholder, after July 13, 1984, or their present or future affiliates, unless, at any time after July 13, 1984, the board of directors of the corporation elects by resolution, adopted by a majority of the continuing directors at a meeting of the board of directors at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the continuing directors is present, to be subject, in whole or in part, specifically, generally, or generally by types, as to specifically identified or unidentified interested shareholders, to the requirements of KRS

271B.12-210

;

The articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation may provide that if the board of directors adopts a resolution under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the resolution shall be subject to approval of the shareholders in the manner and by the vote specified in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws;

An election under this subsection may be added to but may not be altered or repealed except by an amendment to the articles of incorporation adopted by a vote of shareholders meeting the requirements of subsection (5)(a)2. of this section; and

If a corporation elects under this subsection to be included within the provisions of KRS 271B.12-210 generally, without qualification or limitation, it shall file with the secretary of state articles of amendment, including a copy of the resolution making the election and a statement describing the manner in which the resolution was adopted. The articles of amendment shall be executed in the manner required by KRS

271B.10-060

.

Unless the articles of incorporation of the corporation provide otherwise, the requirements of a shareholder vote and board approval in KRS

271B.12-210

do not apply to any business combination of:

A corporation which does not have on the date any interested shareholder became an interested shareholder:

Five hundred (500) or more beneficial owners of its stock;

Its principal executive office located in this state; and

One (1) or more of the following:

(i)

More than two hundred (200) beneficial owners of its stock residing in this state;

(iii)

More than ten percent (10%) of its outstanding stock owned by residents of this state;

(v)

Assets located in this state and owned by, or owned by a person or entity controlled by, the corporation with a value of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000);

2.

A corporation whose original articles of incorporation have a provision, or whose shareholders adopt an amendment to the articles of incorporation after July 13, 1984, by a vote of at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes entitled to be cast by outstanding shares of voting stock of the corporation, voting together as a single voting group and two-thirds (2/3) of the votes entitled to be cast by persons, if any, who are not interested shareholders of the corporation, voting together as a single voting group, expressly electing not to be governed by KRS

271B.12-210

; or

3.

An investment company registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended; a bank or a bank holding company as defined in the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended; a savings and loan holding company as defined in the federal Savings and Loan Holding Company Amendments of 1967, as amended; and a domestic insurer as defined under KRS

304.1-070

; and

More than ten percent (10%) of the beneficial owners of its stock residing in this state;

More than one hundred (100) employees of the corporation and its subsidiaries working within this state; or

For purposes of subparagraph 1. of paragraph (a) of this subsection, all shareholders of a corporation who have executed an agreement to which the corporation is an executing party governing the purchase and sale of stock of the corporation or a voting trust agreement governing stock of the corporation shall be considered a single beneficial owner of the stock covered by the agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 355, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1988 ch. 22, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 23, § 176, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.12-230.
KRS 271B.12-200 to 271B.12-220 prevail over other provisions of KRS Chapter 271B — Severability of provisions.

The provisions of KRS

271B.12-200

to

271B.12-220

are in addition to and do not repeal any other provisions of KRS Chapter 271B that govern any corporate actions described in KRS

271B.12-200

to

271B.12-220

; provided, that in the event of a direct conflict between any provision of KRS 271B.12-200 to 271B.12-220 and any other provision of KRS Chapter 271B, the provision of KRS 271B.12-200 to 271B.12-220 shall prevail.

It shall be considered that, for the purposes of KRS

446.090

, it is the intent of the general assembly in enacting KRS

271B.12-200

to

271B.12-220

that any clause, sentence, subparagraph, paragraph, subsection, section, or other part of the above-stated sections or the application thereof to any person or circumstances held to be invalid shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of the stated sections or the application of that part held invalid to any other person or circumstances, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, subparagraph, paragraph, subsection, section, or other part thereof directly involved in that holding or to the person or circumstances therein involved.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 355, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 22, § 4, effective July 1, 1988.